Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 3 Pay, Pensions, and Allowances

38-2-250.
Pay while on active service; special duty; travel expenses; minimum base pay.

Each member of the militia ordered into the active service of the state pursuant to Code Sections 38-2-6, 38-2-6.1, and 38-2-72 or Code Section 45-12-31 or 45-12-34, shall receive for each day of such duty the same pay and allowances received by members of the appropriate force of the armed forces of the United States of corresponding grade, rating, and length of service.

Pay and allowances for each day of special duty and state active duty provided for in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 38-2-25 shall be the same as the pay and allowances prescribed for members of the appropriate force of the armed forces of the United States of corresponding grade, rating, and length of service.

In addition to the pay and allowances provided for members of the militia under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, such members shall also receive necessary travel expenses where authorized.

The minimum base pay provided for members of the militia under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall be $30.00 for each day of duty.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as to apply when the National Guard is called into active service pursuant to Title 32 of the United States Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-903; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 21; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 75; Ga. L. 1964, p. 684, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 228, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 322, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 886, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 105, § 2; Ga. L. 2021, p. 321, § 1/HB 105.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, inserted “, 38-2-6.1,” near the beginning of subsection (a).

38-2-251.
[Reserved] Pay, care, etc., when injured or disabled in service; pensions; medical examining boards; rehearings.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1585, § 5, effective July 1, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 38(1)/HB 942, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective May 1, 2012.

38-2-252.
Uniform allowance for officers.

Whenever the military fund will permit, the Governor, in his discretion, may prescribe an allowance to officers to cover the expense of their uniforms, arms, and equipment.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-1002; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 21; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 77.